Louisiana, session 2026, HB217.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1703.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1703.2. Exemption; optional exemption for certain rehabilitated property
A. The purpose of this Section is to provide for implementation of the
optional ad valorem tax exemption authorized pursuant to Article VII, Section 21(P)
of the Constitution of Louisiana for blighted or derelict property that has been
rehabilitated. If implemented by a parish, the exemption shall apply to all millages
imposed within the parish and shall be subject to the conditions, requirements, and
limitations established in this Section.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following terms shall have the meanings
ascribed to them in this Subsection:
(1) "Blighted property" means any immovable property that has been
declared or certified as blighted and declared a public nuisance by a court of
competent jurisdiction or an administrative hearing officer acting in accordance with
applicable law.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 217 ENROLLED
(2) "Derelict property" means any building or other structure which has any
of the following characteristics:
(a) Is structurally unsafe.
(b) Does not have adequate egress.
(c) Constitutes a fire hazard.
(d) Is otherwise dangerous to human life.
(e) Because of existing use or condition, constitutes a hazard to public safety,
health, or welfare by reason of inadequate maintenance, dilapidation, obsolescence,
fire hazard, or abandonment.
C. A parish governing authority may, by resolution, elect to implement the
ad valorem tax exemption authorized in Article VII, Section 21(P) of the
Constitution of Louisiana for blighted or derelict property that has been rehabilitated.
Any parish governing authority that elects to implement the exemption shall
establish all of the following:
(1) A process by which a property owner may apply for the exemption.
(2) Rehabilitation standards that a property must meet in order to qualify for
the exemption.
(3) Criteria for approving an application for the exemption.
(4) Conditions for revocation of a previously approved exemption.
(5) Any other policies or procedures as may be necessary for administration
of the exemption.
D. The terms of the exemption shall be as follows:
(1) For residential property, not more than seventy-five percent of the
assessed value of the property may be exempted from ad valorem taxation for a
period not exceeding twenty years.
(2) For a tract or lot of unimproved land, not more than twenty-five percent
of the assessed value of the property may be exempted from ad valorem taxation for
a period not exceeding ten years. In order to qualify for the exemption, a tract or lot
of unimproved land shall be adjacent to a tract or lot upon which a residential or
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 217 ENROLLED
commercial structure is situated. No property owner may be granted exemptions for
more than two tracts or lots of unimproved land.
E. No property owner shall be eligible for any exemption authorized
pursuant to this Section unless the owner holds title to the property identified in the
application for the exemption.
F. The Louisiana Tax Commission may promulgate rules in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to implement the provisions of
this Section.
G. Notwithstanding any provision of this Section to the contrary, a parish or
municipality may elect, by ordinance or resolution, to opt out of the property tax
limitations established herein for properties that are:
(1) Located within a designated redevelopment area, blight elimination zone,
or similar district established by the governing authority; and
(2) Subject to an adopted redevelopment plan that includes the use of
property tax revenues to support public financing mechanisms, including but not
limited to bonds, reimbursements, or other tools intended to address appraisal gaps
or fund site preparation, infrastructure, or redevelopment costs.
H. For purposes of this Section, a redevelopment area may include any
geographic area designated by the governing authority, including areas up to and
including the full jurisdictional boundaries of the governing authority, as defined in
the adopted redevelopment plan.
I. The governing authority may designate one or more public entities,
nonprofit organizations, or qualified development entities to support the creation,
implementation, or administration of redevelopment plans, to assist in accessing or
deploying financing mechanisms authorized under such plans, and to facilitate or
undertake redevelopment activities necessary to carry out such plans.
J. The duration, scope, and application of any such election shall be
determined by the governing authority in accordance with the adopted
redevelopment plan and applicable law.
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 217 ENROLLED
K. Any governing authority or designated entity responsible for the
administration or investment of property tax revenues pursuant to a redevelopment
plan adopted under this Section that includes the use of such revenues to support the
redevelopment of blighted or formerly blighted properties shall be subject to
financial oversight, including periodic audits or financial reporting, in accordance
with applicable law or as determined appropriate by the governing authority.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027, but only if the
proposed amendment of Article VII of the Constitution of Louisiana contained in the Act
which originated as House Bill No. 214 of this 2026 Regular Session of the Legislature is
adopted at a statewide election and becomes effective.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.